South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S841.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-3-10(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A)(1) There is hereby created the State Election Commission composed of five members, at least one of whom shall be a member of the majority political party represented in the General Assembly and at least one of whom shall be a member of the largest minority political party represented in the General Assembly, to be appointed by the Governor, upon the advice and consent of the Senate, to serve terms of four years and until their successors have been appointed and qualify. (2) Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as the original appointment. Provided, however, that if the vacancy occurs during the interim period between the regular legislative sessions, then the office may be filled by an interim appointment of the Governor only if the Governor acts to fill the vacancy during the same interim period during which the office was vacated. If the Senate votes to reject an interim appointee's formal appointment during the next ensuing regular session of the General Assembly, then the office is immediately vacant and may not be filled by another interim appointment. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----